Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-941
Personal qualifications, defined.

Personal qualifications means criteria related to an individual's personal background and characteristics, including completion of an approved educational program, satisfactory performance on an examination, work experience, other evidence of attainment of requisite skills or knowledge, moral standing, criminal history, and completion of continuing education.

Laws 2018, LB299, § 9.